test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Pron-kis_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Pronoun - kis: # pronouns 8 'eng /est kes/fin' - full paradigm
     kis+Pron+Sg+Nom: kis
     kis+Pron+Sg+Gen: [kīen, kīnga]
     kis+Pron+Sg+Par: [kīenta, kīenda]
     kis+Pron+Sg+Dat: [kīen, kīngan]
     kis+Pron+Sg+Ins: [kīenkõks, kīngaks]
     kis+Pron+Sg+Ill: kīenõ
     kis+Pron+Sg+Ela: kīenstõ
     kis+Pron+Pl+Nom: kis
     kis+Pron+Pl+Gen: kīend
     kis+Pron+Pl+Par: kīendi
     kis+Pron+Pl+Dat: kīendõn
     kis+Pron+Pl+Ins: kīendõks
     kis+Pron+Pl+Ill: kīeniž
     kis+Pron+Pl+Ela: kīenšti
